<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88616-0038 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-16-88.f2.A1037</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">42 CFR Parts 405, 489, 1001 and 1003</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[BERC-393-P]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Medicare Program; Participation in CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA, Hospital Admissionsfor Veterans, Discharge Rights Notice, and Hosptial Responsibility forEmergency Care</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCIES: </T2>Health Care Financing Administration (HCFA) and Officeof Inspector General (OIG), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>We are proposing to revise requirements for Medicareparticipating hospitals by adding the following:  andbullet; A hospital must provide inpatient hospital services to individualswho have health coverage provided by either the Civilian Health and MedicalProgram of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) or the Civilian Health andMedical Program of the Veterans Administration (CHAMPVA), subject to limitationsprovided by regulations, and accept the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA-determined allowableamount as payment in full for the services.  andbullet; A hospital must provide inpatient hospital services to militaryveterans (subject to the limitations provided in 38 CFR 17.50 ff.) andaccept payment from the Veterans Administration as payment in full.  andbullet; A hospital must give each beneficiary a statement of his or herrights concerning discharge from the hospital.  andbullet; A hospital with an emergency department must provide, upon requestand within the capabilities of the hospital, an appropriate medical screeningexamination and stabilizing treatment to any individual with an emergencymedical condition and to any woman in active labor, regardless of the individual'seligibility for Medicare.  HCFA would provide for the termination of a provider's agreement for violationof any of these provisions. In addition, OIG would provide for suspensionof a provider's agreement and for civil monetary penalties for violationof the emergency care provision.  These revisions would implement sections 9121 and 9122 of the ConsolidatedOmnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (as amended by section 4009 ofthe Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987), section 233 of the Veterans'Benefit Improvement and Health Care Authorization Act of 1986, and section9305(b)(1) of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments will be considered if we receive them at the appropriateaddress, as provided below, no later than 5:00 p.m. on August 15, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Mail comments to the following address: Health Care FinancingAdministration, Department of Health and Human Services, Attention: BERC-393-P,P.O. Box 26676, Baltimore, Maryland 21207.Please address a copy of comments on information collection requirementsto: Allison Herron, EOMB Desk Officer for HCFA, Office of Information andRegulatory Affairs, Room 3002, New Executive Office Building, Washington,DC 20503.If you prefer, you may deliver your comments to one of the following addresses:<ITAG tagnum="15">Room 309-G, Hubert H. Humphrey Building, 200 Independence Ave. SW.,Washington, DC, or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Room 132, East High Rise Building, 6325 Security Boulevard, Baltimore,Maryland.</ITAG>In commenting, please refer to file code BERC-393-P.Comments received timely will be available for public inspection as theyare received, which generally begins about three weeks after publicationof a document, in Room 309-G of the Department's offices at 200 IndependenceAve., SW., Washington, DC, on Monday through Friday of each week from 8:30a.m. to 5:00 p.m. (phone: 202-245-7890).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2><ITAG tagnum="15">Thomas Hoyer, 301-966-4607. For all provisions except suspensionsand civil monetary penalties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Jim Patton 301-965-9601. For provisions relating to suspensions andcivil monetary penalties.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>A. Participation in the CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA ProgramsCHAMPUS (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services)and CHAMPVA (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Veterans Administration)programs pay for health care services furnished to dependents and survivorsof military personnel, of retirees and their dependents, and of veterans.Generally, the programs have paid hospitals based on their charges. Section931 of the Department of Defense Authorization Act, 1984 (Pub. L. 98-94)authorized these programs to pay (to the extent practicable) for inpatienthospital services using Medicare reimbursement procedures. Because theMedicare prospective payment system (PPS) (the system whereby we pay ahospital a predetermined amount based on the patient's diagnosis and anysurgical procedures preformed, rather than by the number of days hospitalized)results in Medicare cost savings, the Department of Defense (DoD) expectsthat it would realize similar savings if it were to use a model similarto Medicare's PPS. Paying on the basis of a fixed rate appropriate to theparticular diagnosis involved has been shown to be an equitable methodof paying for hospital care. Therefore, the Office of Civilian Health andMedical Program of the Uniformed Services (OCHAMPUS) has published a finalrule which includes provisions for the implementation of a DRG-based paymentsystem modeled after Medicare's PPS for CHAMPUS inpatient hospital admissionsoccurring on or after October 1, 1987 (52 FR 32992).Hospitals that furnish services to CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA beneficiaries areauthorized to provide services to these beneficiaries following an approvalprocess similar to that used for Medicare participation. All hospitalscertified by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Health Care Organizations(JCAHO) are authorized providers; any Medicare hospital may be (and allhave been thus far) deemed to be authorized providers. All others are surveyedby OCHAMPUS to determine whether they are authorized providers.``Participation'' has a different meaning for CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA thanfor Medicare: providers have been able to decide on a case-by-case basiswhether to ``participate'' in the program and thus accept the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA-determinedallowable amount as payment in full (under these programs, beneficiariesare required to pay a cost-share for each hospital admission, and thisis considered to be separate from the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA payment). Under Medicare,hospitals must agree to bill the program for all beneficiaries and acceptMedicare payment as payment in full (less applicable deductibles, coinsuranceamounts, and noncovered items).As indicated above, all Medicare hospitals are also authorized providersin CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA on the basis of their JCAHO-approved status or aredeemed authorized providers based on their Medicare-approved status. Thebenefits to the DoD of requiring them to be paid either under a DRG-basedpayment system or based on reasonable cost are lost, however, if the hospitalscan selectively participate in the CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA programs. Congress,in section 9122 of COBRA, now requires all Medicare hospitals, beginningJanuary 1987, to participate in CHAMPUS or CHAMPVA as authorized providers(i.e., they must bill CHAMPUS or CHAMPVA and accept the CHAMPVA/CHAMPUS-determinedallowable amount as payment in full_less applicable deductible, patientcost-share, and noncovered items).B. Participation in the Veterans Administration (VA) Health Care ProgramA retired veteran with a service-connected disability is not required touse Veterans Administration (VA) hospitals but may elect to receive servicesfrom ``civilian'' providers and be reimbursed through CHAMPUS. However,once the VA has made or has authorized payment for services related toa service-connected disability, the veteran is to obtain all services throughthe VA. In cases where the veteran receives services from a non-VA hospital,either through choice or because there is no available VA hospital whichcan provide the necessary services, the VA pays for the services basedon the hospital's charges.As with CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA, when they also paid the hospital's charges,this type of payment is more expensive than payment on a prospective basisor based on reasonable costs. As a result, the VA is setting up a nationalprospective payment system.To alleviate hospital expenses for the VA, Congress passed section 233of the Veterans' Benefit Improvement and Health-Care Authorization Actof 1986 (Pub. L. 99-576). This section requires Medicare hospitals to bepraticipating providers of medical care to veterans eligible to receivecare at the hospital. The hospital then would receive payment for the servicesunder the applicable VA payment system, rather than simply on the basisof the hospital's charges.C. Statement of Beneficiary RightsAfter the prospective payment system became effective for the Medicareprogram, we began to hear allegations that Medicare beneficiaries weredischarged too early from the hospital and we also began to receive complaintsthat patients did not understand their rights as Medicare beneficiariesin cases where they were advised that discharge was appropriate but theydisagreed. On April 17, 1985, 42 CFR 466.78(b)(3) was revised requiringall hospitals to provide Medicare beneficiaries with information aboutPRO review, including their appeal rights (50 FR 15331). In further responseto concerns about early discharges and lack of adequate appeal information,we began requiring hospitals to furnish each beneficiary upon admissiona specific statement developed by HCFA (i.e., the ``Important Message fromMedicare'') telling a beneficiary of his rights to be fully informed aboutdecisions affecting Medicare coverage or payment and about appeal rightsin response to any hospital notices to the effect that Medicare will nolonger cover the care. The ``Message'' we developed also advises the patientwhat to do when he receives such a hospital statement and how to elicitmore information. The requirements relating to the ``Important Messagefrom Medicare'' were incorporated into the program's operating instructions.Congress subsequently passed section 9305(b) of the Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1986 (OBRA 86). Now, as part of its participation agreement withMedicare, each hospital must agree to furnish each Medicare beneficiarywith a notice, at or about the time of admission, that explains the patient'srights in detail.D. Responsibilities of Medicare Participating Hospitals in Emergency CasesHospitals that choose to participate in the Medicare program agree in writingto meet various requirements included in section 1866 of the Social SecurityAct (the Act). Before enactment of Pub. L. 99-272 on April 7, 1986, theAct did not specifically address the issue of how hospitals with emergencymedical departments must handle individuals who have emergency medicalconditions or who are in active labor.In its Report accompanying H.R. 3128, the House Ways and Means Committeeindicated that Congress was concerned about the increasing number of reportsthat hospital emergency rooms are refusing to accept or treat patientswith emergency conditions, including medically unstable patients, if thepatients do not have medical insurance. In addition, the Report statedthat there have been reports that patients in an unstable condition havebeen transferred improperly, sometimes without the consent of the receivinghospital. Because Congress believed that this situation may have worsenedsince the Medicare prospective payment system for hospitals became effective,the Report states that the Committee ``wants to provide a strong assurancethat pressure for greater hospital efficiency are not to be construed aslicense to ignore traditional community responsibilities and loosen historicstandards.'' (H.R. Rep. No. 99-241, 99th Cong., 1st Sess. 27 (1985).) Asa result of this concern, Congress enacted section 9121 of the ConsolidatedOmnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (COBRA) of 1985, Pub. L. 99-272.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Legislation</ITAG>A. Participation in CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA ProgramsSection 9122 of COBRA amended section 1866(a)(1) of the Act by adding anew paragraph (J), which requires hospitals in the Medicare program tobe participating providers of medical care, for inpatient services only,under any health plan contracted for under 10 U.S.C. 1079 or 1086 (CHAMPUS)or under 38 U.S.C. 613 (CHAMPVA), in accordance with admission practicesand payment methodology and amounts as prescribed under joint regulationsissued by the Secretaries of Health and Human Services, Defense and Transportation.This requirement applies to services furnished to CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA beneficiariesadmitted on or after January 1, 1987.(Section 9122 of COBRA also required that the legislation apply to allagreements entered into on or after April 7, 1986, but this requirementwas deleted by section 1895(b)(6) of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Pub. L.99-514), enacted October 22, 1986.)B. Participation in the Veterans Administration Health Care ProgramSection 233 of the Veterans' Benefit Improvement and Health-Care AuthorizationAct of 1986 (Pub. L. 99-576) was enacted on October 28, 1986. It addeda new paragraph (L) to section 1866(a)(1) of the Act. It requires hospitalsthat participate in Medicare to be participating providers under 38 U.S.C.603, in accordance with the admissions practices, and payment methodologyand amounts, prescribed under joint regulations issues to implement thissection by the Secretary of HHS and the Administrator of the VA. This provisionapplies to services furnished to veterans admitted on or after July 1,1987.C. Statement of Beneficiary RightsThe Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1986 (OBRA 86) was enacted onOctober 21, 1986. Section 9305(b)(1) of OBRA 86 adds a new paragraph (M)to section 1866(a)(1) of the Act. That paragraph puts current regulatoryand administrative policies into statute and requires a hospital that iseligible to participate in the Medicare program to agree to furnish, uponadmission, a beneficiary, or an individual acting on his or her behalf,with a written statement of the beneficiary's discharge rights. The Statementmust explain:(1) The individual's rights to benefits for inpatient hospital servicesand for posthospital services under Medicare; (2) The circumstances under which the beneficiary will and will not beliable for charges for continued stay in the hospital; (3) The beneficiary's right to appeal denials of benefits for continuedinpatient hospital services, including the practical steps to initiatethe appeal; (4) The individual's liability for services if the denial of benefits isupheld on appeal; and (5) Additional information that the Secretary specifies. Section 9305(b)(2) of OBRA 86 requires that we prescribe the language tobe used in the statement not later than six months after the effectivedate of OBRA 86. After we have developed the revised language for the statementrequired under OBRA, the hospitals must begin complying with the requirementto give the revised statement to beneficiaries upon admission. D. Responsibilities of Medicare Participating Hospitals in Emergency CasesThe Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (COBRA) of 1985 wasenacted on April 7, 1986. Section 9121 prohibits hospitals with emergencymedical departments from refusing to treat medically unstable patients.It also contains provisions designed to halt the inappropriate transfersof these patients to other medical facilities. Section 9121 of COBRA added a paragraph (i) to section 1866(a)(1) of theAct and added a new section 1867 to the Act. Section 1866(a)(1)(I) requiresthat a hospital participating in the Medicare program must agree to complywith the requirements of section 1867 of the Act to the extent applicable.Section 1867 provides the following: (a) A hospital with an emergency department must, within the capabilitiesof its emergency department, provide an appropriate medical screening examinationto any individual who comes to the emergency department for examinationor treatment of a medical condition or of active labor and on whose behalfthe examination or treatment is requested; the purpose of the examinationis to determine whether the individual has an emergency medical conditionor is in active labor. This requirement applies regardless of the individual'seligibility for Medicare benefits. (b) If an individual, regardless of eligibility for Medicare benefits,has an emergency medical condition or is in active labor, the hospitalmust either provide for further examination and treatment (within its capabilities)or make an appropriate transfer of the patient to another medical facility,unless the treatment or transfer is refused. (c) A hospital may not transfer a patient unless_(1) (A) He or she, or a legally responsible person acting on his or herbehalf, requests the transfer, or (B) a physician, or other qualified medicalpersonnel when a physician is not readily available, has certified thatthe medical benefits expected from the treatment at the new facility outweighthe increased risks to the patient's condition resulting from the transfer;and (2) The transfer is an ``appropriate transfer'', as defined below. An ``appropriate transfer'' is a transfer: (1) In which the receiving facilityhas available space and qualified personnel for the treatment of the patientand has agreed to accept the transfer and to provide appropriate medicaltreatment; (2) in which the transferring hospital provides the receivingfacility with appropriate medical records (or copies) of the examinationand treatment furnished at the transferring hospital; (3) in which thetransfer is effected through qualified personnel and transportation equipment,as required, including the use of necessary and medically appropriate lifesupport measures during the transfer; and (4) that meets other requirementsas the Secretary may find necessary in the interest of the health and safetyof the patient.(d) A hospital that fails to meet the requirements of section 1867 of theAct_(1) Is subject to termination of its Medicare agreement or, at the optionof the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS),suspension of the Medicare agreement if it knowingly and willfully, ornegligently, fails to comply with section 1867. The suspension is subjectto reasonable notice to the hospital and the public and is for a durationthat the Secretary determines to be appropriate; and(2) Is also subject to civil monetary penalties (which are in additionto those provided under section 1128A of the Act) if it knowingly violatessection 1867. The penalty cannot exceed $25,000 for each violation committedbetween August 1, 1986 (the effective date of the amendment) and December21, 1987, or $50,000 for violations on or after December 22, 1987. (Theamount was raised by section 4009(a)(1) of the Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-203), effective December 22, 1987.) Each responsiblephysician is also subject to a civil money penalty of not more than $25,000for each knowing violation ($50,000 for violations on or after December22, 1987). A responsible physician may also be excluded from Medicare participationfor up to five years.``A responsible physician'' is a physician within the meaning of section1861(r)(1) of the Act (doctor of medicine or osteopathy) who is employedby, or under contract with, the participating provider and acting as suchhas professional responsibility for the provision of examination or treatmentof the individual, or transfer of the individual.(e) If a hospital violates the requirements of section 1867 and a patientsuffers personal harm as a direct result, he or she may, in a civil actionagainst the participating hospital, obtain damages for personal injuryunder the law of the State in which the hospital is located and may obtainsuch equitable relief as is appropriate.(f) Any medical facility that suffers a financial loss as a direct resultof a participating hospital's violation of section 1867 may obtain damagesavailable in a civil action against the participating hospital, under thelaw of the State in which the hospital is located, and may obtain suchequitable relief as is appropriate.(g) No civil action under (e) and (f) above may be brought more than twoyears after the date of the violation with respect to which the actionis brought.(h) Section 1867 also contains definitions of several other terms: ``emergencymedical condition,'' ``participating hosptial,'' ``active labor,'' ``tostabilize,'' ``stabilized,'' and `'transfer.''(i) The provisions of section 1867 do not preempt any State or local lawexcept where they directly conflict.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Provisions of the Proposed Regulations</ITAG>A. Participation in CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA programsWe would revise andSection; 489.20, Basic commitments, to show that a participatingMedicare hospital must agree to participate in the CHAMPUS and CHAMPVAprograms and accept the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA-determined allowable amount aspayment in full in accordance with a new andSection; 489.25, which incorporatesstatutory provisions.In a new section, 42 CFR 489.25, we would require Medicare participatinghospitals to be participating providers in the CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA programs.We would require the hospitals to comply with Department of Defense regulationsgoverning admissions practices and payment methodology and amounts forsuch services. (Those regulations would be issued jointly by the Secretariesof Defense, Transportation and Health and Human Services; CHAMPUS has publisheda final rule that contains provisions for the implementation of a DRG-basedpayment system, as mentioned earlier.) We would continue the policy thathospitals participating in CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA that also participate inMedicare must meet all Medicare conditions of participation. Thus, if CHAMPUSor CHAMPVA have requirements for participating that differ from Medicare's,Medicare's requirements would have to be met.We would require hospitals to accept the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA-determined allowableamount as payment in full for the services provided to these beneficiaries(less applicable deductible, patient cost-share, and noncovered items).In addition, we would add a new paragraph (11) to andSection; 489.53, Terminationsby HHS, to show that a hospital that does not meet the requirements ofandSection; 489.25 would be subject to possible termination. We do not anticipatethat Medicare participating hospitals will refuse to accept CHAMPUS orCHAMPVA beneficiaries under these proposed requirements. Should one doso, we would expect appropriate officials from the Department of Defenseor Transportation to notify us and we would then discuss the issue withthe hospital in hopes of resolving it. If it cannot be resolved, the HCFAregional office would terminate the hospital's provider agreement underthe provisions of 42 CFR Part 489, Subpart E, since the hospital's refusalto participate in the CHAMPUS or CHAMPVA programs would violate 42 CFR489.25 of these regulations.These revisions would apply only to inpatient hospital services furnishedto beneficiaries admitted on or after January 1, 1987.B. Participation in the Veterans Administration Health Care ProgramTo implement section 233 of Pub. L. 99-576, we propose to add a new andSection;489.26. Hospitals do not enter into participation agreements with the VeteransAdministration program as they do if they choose to participate in theMedicare program or the CHAMPUS or CHAMPVA programs. Instead, the VA authorizespayment for the treatment, usually on a pre-admission basis at a designatedhospital that furnishes the service. We would require a Medicare participatinghospital to admit any veteran whose hospitalization is authorized by theVA under 38 U.S.C. 603 (this includes emergency cases, which may be authorizedafter admission). The hospital would have to meet the requirements of 38CFR Part 17 regarding admission practices and payment methodology and amounts.This arrangement would not affect the hospitals' need to meet all Medicarehospital conditions of participation.We would also revise andSection; 489.20, Basic commitments, to require hospitalsto admit veterans whose admission is authorized under 38 U.S.C. 603 andto meet the requirements of andSection; 489.26.We would also revise andSection; 489.53, Termination by HCFA, to show thatHHS may terminate any hospital that fails to meet the requirements of andSection;489.26. This would be included with the paragraph (11) requiring hospitalsto participate in CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA.As with the CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA programs, we do not anticipate that Medicareparticipating hospitals will resist the requirement to admit veterans.Should one do so, we would expect the appropriate official of the VeteransAdministration to notify us and we would then discuss the issue with thehospital in hopes of resolving it. If it cannot be resolved, the HCFA regionaloffice would terminate the hospital's provider agreement under the provisionsof 42 CFR Part 489, Subpart E, since the hospital's refusal to admit veteransviolates 42 CFR 489.26 of these regulations.The VA is developing the regulations necessary to implement the statute(e.g., regarding payment methodology).These regulations would apply to inpatient services furnished to veteransadmitted on or after July 1, 1987.C. Statement of Beneficiary RightsWe would add a new section, 42 CFR 489.27, to require participating hospitalsthat furnish inpatient hospital services to Medicare beneficiaries to giveevery beneficiary (or individual acting on his or her behalf) at or aboutthe time of admission the ``Important Message from Medicare.'' We wouldnot specify the contents of the ``Message'' in these regulations, as thehospital will not be responsible for writing it; we will distribute tothe hospitals the ``Message'' that the hospitals are to use.We expect the ``Important Message from Medicare'' to be available beforethis rule becomes final. The law is self-implementing, and it requiresthe language for the statement to be prescribed within six months of theenactment of the legislation and distributed by hospitals within two monthsafter it is prescribed. This rule would merely conform the regulationsto the statute.We have revised the earlier ``An Important Message from Medicare'' to incorporatethe statutory requirements and have solicited comments from major beneficiaryand provider organizations, such as the Gray Panthers, the American HospitalAssociation and the American Association of Retired Persons. We have alsosent the ``Message'' to both the Senate and House Select Committees onAging. The imput from the various entities have been valuable in determiningthe final version of the ``Message''We would require the hospital to obtain a separate signed acknowledgementfrom the beneficiary attesting to the receipt of the ``Important Messagefrom Medicare'' and to retain a copy of the acknowledgement. Effectivewith admissions on and after March 24, 1986, peer review organizations(PROs) have been required to monitor each hospital to assure that the hospitaldistributes ``An important Message from Medicare'' to all Medicare beneficiaries.However, in practice, it has been very difficult for PROs to monitor theissuance of ``An Important Message from Medicare'' due to a lack of documentation(i.e., the ``Message'' is given to the beneficiaries generally with severalother informational materials upon admission but there is no record ofthe transaction). We have received complaints that in some instances beneficiarieshave not received the ``Message'', were not aware that they received, it,and/or did not realize its significance. It has been suggested, and weagree, that requiring the beneficiary to sign a separate, signed acknowledgementattesting to the receipt of the ``Message'' is a better means of assuringthat he or she knows that this is an important document that should bereviewed. Therefore, we are proposing that the hospital be required toobtain the beneficiary's separate, signed acknowledgement attesting tothe receipt of the ``Message'', and to retain a copy of the acknowledgement.We believe that this is important both to assure that the beneficiary receivesand is aware of the significance of ``An Important Message from Medicare''and to assure that the distribution of it can be monitored. As is alwaysthe case with a notice of proposed rulemaking, we seek public comment onthis proposed requirement.We would also revise andSection; 489.20, Basic commitments, to show thata hospital must distribute the ``Important Message from Medicare''.We would add a new paragraph (12) to andSection; 489.53, Terminations byHHS, to show that a hospital failing to meet the requirements of andSection;489.27 may be terminated. Whether or not HHS would terminate a providerwould depend on HCFA's judgement as to the scope of the failure and thehospital's correction or plan for correction of the failure. We do notanticipate any hospital opposition to the requirement that the ``Message''be distributed. We believe we already have full cooperation from hospitals.These revisions would apply only to Medicare admissions beginning afterwe have distributed ``An Important Message from Medicare''.D. Hospital Emergency CareThe revisions to the regulations we are proposing would be revisions andadditions to 42 CFR Part 489, Provider Agreements under Medicare, and revisionsto 42 CFR Part 1001, Program Integrity_Medicare, and Part 1003, Civil MoneyPenalties and Assessments. Basically, the provisions would parallel thestatute.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Requirements for Hospitals with Emergency Care Departments</ITAG>a. We would revise 42 CFR 489.20, which discusses basic commitments, byadding a new paragraph to require hospitals with emergency departments,as part of their participation agreement, to agree to comply with the newandSection; 489.24, which incorporates the statutory requirements.b. We would add a new andSection; 489.24, Special responsibilities of Medicarehospitals in emergency cases, to set forth requirements for emergency casesfor all hospitals that have provider agreements with Medicare. We wouldrequire a hospital to take the following measures.<T3>i. Medical Screening Requirement. </T3>For any individual, regardlessof his or her eligibility for Medicare, for whom emergency treatment orexamination is requested, we would require a hospital with an emergencydepartment to provide for an appropriate medical screening examinationwithin the emergency department's capability to determine whether an emergencymedical condition exists or whether the individual is in active labor,as defined below. The examinations would have to be conducted by individualsdetermined qualified by hospital by-laws and who meet the Medicare requirementsof 42 CFR 482.55, which are that emergency services be supervised by aqualified member of the medical staff and that there be adequate medicaland nursing personnel qualified in emergency care to meet the written emergencyprocedures and needs anticipated by the facility.We would allow hospitals maximum flexibility in their utilization of emergencycare personnel by not including specific requirements concerning educationor credentials for individuals conducting emergency medical examinations.This policy is consistent with the specified intent of the conditions ofparticipation (51 FR 22010; 42 CFR Part 482).<T3>ii. Necessary Stabilizing Treatment for Emergency Medical Conditionsand Active Labor. </T3>If the individual has an emergency medical conditionor is in active labor, the hospital would have to provide either furthermedical examination and treatment to stabilize the medical condition ortreatment of the labor or transfer the individual appropriately to anothermedical facility. We would not hold the hospital responsible if the individual,or a legally responsible person acting on the individual's behalf, refusesto consent in writing to the further examination and treatment or the appropriatetransfer to another hospital.Under these provisions, the hospital is responsible for treating and stabilizingany individual, regardless of eligibility for Medicare, who presents himselfor herself with an emergency condition at the hospital, and for providingsuch care until the condition ceases to be an emergency or until the patientis properly transferred to another facility. We interpret this to mean,for example, that if a hospital were to admit and then transfer a patientbefore his or her condition is stabilized, except as provided below, itwould be a violation of section 1867 of the Act.<T3>iii. Transfers and Restrictions. </T3>If an individual at a hospitalhas an emergency medical condition that has not been stabilized or theindividual is in active labor, the hospital could not appropriately transferthe individual unless one of the following conditions exist:andbullet; The individual (or a legally responsible person on the individual'sbehalf) requests the transfer.andbullet; A physician (or other qualified medical personnel if a physicianis not readily available in the emergency department) has certified inwriting that, based upon the reasonable risks and benefits to the individualand the information available at the time, the medical benefits reasonablyexpected from the provision of appropriate medical treatment at the otherfacility outweigh the increased risks to the individual's medical conditionfrom the transfer.We would consider a transfer to be appropriate only if the receiving medicalfacility has available space and qualified personnel for the treatmentof the individual and has agreed to accept transfer of the individual andto provide appropriate medical treatment. The transferring hospital wouldhave to furnish the receiving medical facility with timely appropriatemedical records (or copies) of the examination and treatment provided bythe transferring hospital. The patient would have to be accompanied byqualified personnel during the transfer; transportation arrangements wouldhave to include the use of necessary and medically appropriate life supportmeasures.Although the statute authorized the Secretary to find that the transfermust meet ``other requirements'' in the interest of the health and safetyof patients transferred, we are not at this time proposing to adopt any.We do however specifically invite public comment concerning any ``otherrequirements'' the Secretary should consider adopting regarding the healthand safety of emergency department patients being transferred between medicalfacilities.<T3>iv. Definitions. </T3>We would include in 42 CFR 489.24 the followingdefinitions as included in the statute, without interpretation:andbullet; ``Active labor'' means labor at a time when delivery is imminent,there is inadequate time to effect safe transfer to another hospital beforedelivery, or a transfer may pose a threat to the health and safety of thepatient or the unborn child.andbullet; An ``emergency medical condition'' means a medical condition manifestedby acute symptoms of sufficient severity (including severe pain) that theabsence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected toresult in: (a) Placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy; (b) seriousimpairment to bodily functions; or (c) serious dysfunction of any bodilyorgan or part.andbullet; ``To stabilize'' means, with respect to an emergency medical condition,to provide the medical treatment of the condition necessary to assure,within reasonable medical probability, that no material deterioration ofthe condition is likely to result from the transfer of the individual froma facility.andbullet; ``Stabilized'' means, with respect to an emergency medical condition,that no material deterioration of the condition is likely, within reasonablemedical probability, to result from the transfer of an individual froma facility.andbullet; ``Transfer'' means the movement (including the discharge) of apatient to outside a hospital's facilities at the direction of any personemployed by (or affiliated or associated with, directly or indirectly)the hospital, but it does not include moving a patient who has been declareddead or who leaves the facility without the permission of any person responsiblefor directing transfers.For the purpose of these definitions, the term ``hospital'' means a Medicarefacility certified as a hospital with its own provider number.We would not define ``participating provider'' in Part 489. This is because42 CFR 400.202 defines terms applicable to all of 42 CFR Chapter IV andalready defines ``provider''. A provider by definition agrees to participatein Medicare. The agreement is written and requires the provider to fulfillcertain obligations. Until recently, the existing version of the provideragreement specified provider requirements through a series of referencesto sections of the law and regulations applicable to these issues; howeverthe COBRA changes made it necessary to update these references to includethe new provisions. In December 1986, we revised the provider agreementforms and sent the revised forms to all participating hospitals to sign.The revised forms were accompanied by a letter explaining the new provisionsof law that affect the obligations of providers. (Although not all agreementshave been returned signed to us, section 1895(b)(4) of the Tax Reform Actof 1986 (Pub. L. 99-514) amended section 1867(e)(3) of the Act to makeit clear that providers did not have to execute a new written agreementspecifically to obligate them to comply with section 1867. Rather, thehospitals are obligated to comply with the requirements of section 1867by virtue of the statute and their current agreements.)We would add a definition of ``participating hospital'' and the remainingstatutory definition, that of ``responsible physician'', to 42 CFR ChapterV (Parts 1001 and 1003), since these terms are used in conjunction withmonetary penalties, which is under the jurisdiction of the Office of InspectorGeneral. We discuss the definition of ``responsible physician'' below under``Civil Monetary Penalties.''We invite public comment regarding all definitions.c. We propose to amend 42 CFR Parts 489, 1001 ane 1003 to provide for typesof sanctions that would be applied by the Department, as appropriate:i. <T3>Resolution of Allegations and Determination of Liability.</T3> If theevidence available establishes that a hospital knowingly and willfully,or negligently, failed to provide the appropriate screening and treatmentor transfer as explained above, it would be subject to either terminationof its provider agreement by HCFA or suspension of its provider agreementby the OIG in accordance with section 1866(b) of the Act. In addition,the OIG can also impose civil money penalties (CMPs) for knowing violations.When the Department receives a complaint, or any information or allegation,to the effect that a Medicare hospital did not appropriately comply withthe emergency medical screening, stabilizing, treatment or transfer requirements,HCFA would, upon receipt of all available information and evidence, conductsufficient review to determine whether the complaint falls within the jurisdictionof section 1867. If so, HCFA would consider the complaint a substantialallegation and would investigate the allegation thoroughly.HCFA would send each complainant a letter acknowledging receipt of thecomplaint, advising him or her of his or her rights to consider independentlythe civil enforcement provisions of section 1867 and stating that it willrefer the complaint to other agencies if during the complaint investigation,it determines that the matter falls under the jurisdiction of other agencies.Thus, HCFA would refer a complaint to the Office of Civil Rights if itdetermines that a hospital may be in violation of the Hill-Burton SubpartG Community Service regulations at 42 CFR 124.603(b)(1), which requireMedicare participating hospitals that receive Hill-Burton constructiongrants and loans to provide emergency medical services to any person whoresides (or, in the case of some hospitals, works) in the hospital's designatedhealth service area. HCFA would of course inform complainants of the outcomeof its investigations.HCFA would notify State Medicaid authorities, State licensing bodies, theOffice of Inspector General, appropriate Peer Review Organizations andthe Office of Civil Rights concerning all complaint investigations andall termination actions.HCFA would determine whether the hospital knowingly and willfully, or negligently,failed to comply with the requirement of andSection; 489.24 based on evidenceof (i) inadequate treatment or treatment not being provided; (ii) patientsin unstable condition or in active labor not being properly transferredas defined in andSection; 489.24(d)(2); (iii) the hospital's actions, orlack of actions, causing a patient's or infant's death or serious or permanentimpairment to a patient's bodily functions; or (iv) a hospital's actionsplacing a patient's health in serious jeopardy. HCFA would determine thehospital negligent if the hospital and its personnel failed to exercisecare that should normally be supplied to a patient experiencing an emergencymedical condition or active labor as defined in andSection; 489.24(b).<T3>ii. Termination of a provider agreement by HCFA. </T3>HCFA's terminationauthority under this provision is designed so that quick action may betaken to protect the Medicare program, its beneficiaries and other individualsfrom any potential harm. The termination of a provider agreement wouldbe the initial action contemplated against a hospital that knowingly andwillfully, or negligently, failed to meet the requirements set forth inandSection; 489.24. This section would allow for the termination of the hospital'sprovider agreement under Medicare in accordance with section 1866(b) ofthe Act. The termination requirement would be contained in andSection; 489.24as paragraph (e). (The authority to terminate has been delegated from HHSthrough the HCFA Administrator to HCFA Regional Offices.)HCFA would revise 42 CFR 489.53, Termination by HCFA, to include in paragraph(b) failure to comply with the requirements of andSection; 489.24 as a mandatorycause for termination of a provider agreement. HCFA would also revise paragraph(c) to state that, if it determines that a hospital is in violation ofandSection; 489.24(a) through (d), HCFA would consider the violation to posean immediate and serious threat to the health and safety of persons presentingthemselves to the hospital for emergency services and would terminate thehospital's approval for Medicare participation within 2 days of the determinationunless the violation is corrected. In those instances in which HCFA determines that a hospital is in violationof the requirements of the Act, it will initiate termination action. Whenthat action is resolved, HCFA will refer the case to the OIG for possibleimposition of CMPs. If the OIG, upon further investigation, discovers pastviolations that did not form the basis of the termination action, it maydecide that a sanction is warranted and could exercise its authority toimpose a suspension against the reinstated provider. (See section D.3.c.below.) In instances where HCFA finds no violation, and therefore does not takean action, the closed case would still be transmitted to the OIG. If theOIG, upon reviewing the case file, believes that further case developmentis warranted, it would be free to do so. If OIG's investigation indicatesthat there are additional violations that are not reflected in HCFA's casefile, it would refer the new case information back to HCFA with a recommendationthat HCFA terminate the hospital's provider agreement based on the newfindings. Whether or not HCFA takes a termination action on a given case, all investigatedcases will be referred to the OIG for possible imposition of CMPs. <T3>iii. Suspension of a provider agreement by the OIG Termination andsuspension of provider.</T3> Agreements are mutually exclusive remedies;a given violation or a group of violations of section 1867 of the Act maygive rise to termination or suspension, but not both. However, if HCFAhas proposed to terminate, or has terminated, the provider agreement ofa hospital based on one or more specific violations of section 1867, theOIG is not precluded from suspending that hospital's provider agreementat a later date if, upon further investigation, OIG determines that thereare <T3>other</T3> violations of section 1867 indicating that (1) the patternof dumping is more widespread than HCFA initially believed, or (2) theadditional instances of dumping are so egregious that the penalty of suspensionis appropriate. When it is determined that a hospital's provider agreement should be suspended,the OIG would, in accordance with its notice and appeals procedures setforth in andSection;andSection; 1001.100 through 1001.115, give notice to thehospital and the public; the suspension would become effective fifteendays after the date of the notice. The hospital would be able to appealthe suspension before an administrative law judge of the Office of Hearingsand Appeals of the Social Security Administration. The suspension wouldbe for a minimum of 30 days. The notice to the hospital would specify: andbullet; The legal and factual basis for the determination; andbullet; The effective date; andbullet; That the duration of the suspension would be for a minimum of30 days and that during the suspension period, the hospital must demonstratethat further incidents will not occur or the suspension will continue;andbullet; That in addition to denial of payment for Medicare claims, claimsfor Medicaid payments will not be paid for the care of Medicaid recipientsduring the period the provider agreement is suspended; andbullet; That the provider will have the opportunity to be reinstated afterthe suspension, in accordance with andSection;andSection;1001.105 through 1001.114;andbullet; The payment policy in effect during the suspension; and andbullet; The appeal rights of the hospital. For hospitals paid under the prospective payment system, we propose topay for all covered services furnished to Medicare beneficiaries admittedbefore the suspension is effective, including payment for a maximum of30 days after the suspension becomes effective for those cases that qualifyas day outliers. On the other hand, we woud not make any payment for inpatienthospital services furnished to patients who are admitted on or after theeffective date of suspension. For hospitals reimbursed under the reasonable cost system, no payment willbe made for services provided to persons admitted during the suspensionperiod.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>The date of admission is not significant for reasonablecost hospitals.</ITAG>We are proposing to add a new andSection;1001.202 to reflect the above policyconcerning suspension and we are proposing to make the necessary technicalchanges to andSection;andSection;1001.211 and 1001.221 andbullet; We propose to add a new section, andSection;1001.203, to give theprovider procedures to follow when it is suspended and wishes to be reinstatedinto the Medicare program. <T3>iv. Civil Monetary Penalties. </T3>General. andbullet; In addition to termination or suspension of the provider agreement,if a hospital knowlingly violates the requirements concerning screening,treatment and transfer, OIG could also impose a civil money penalty ofnot more than $50,000 for each violation. andbullet; OIG could also impose a civil money penalty upon each ``responsiblephysician'' of not more than $50,000 for each violation. In addition, theOIG may exclude the physician from Medicare participation for up to fiveyears. A responsible physician is a physician within the meaning of section1861(r)(1) of the Act (doctor of medicine or osteopathy) who is employedby, or under contract with the hospital, who, in that capacity, had professionalresponsibility for the provision of examination or treatment for the individual,when the violation occurred. A physician may be employed by, or under contractwith, a hospital even though the physician receives no compensation fromthe hospital for furnishing medical services. For purposes of this provision, a physician would be considered under contractwith the participating hospital, and therefore a responsible physicianwithin the context of these regulations, if he or she has a written ororal agreement to take professional responsibility for providing examinationsor treatment in the hospital's emergency room for individuals seeking emergencymedical care, or for the proper transfer of these individuals whether ornot the physician receives compensation from the hospital for providingthe services. In addition, if the provision of emergency medical services is shared bymore than one responsible physician, each responsible physician could beheld liable and a civil money penalty up to the maximum amount, as wellas exclusion from the Medicare program for up to five years, could be imposedagainst each responsible physician for each violation. We would revise andSection;andSection;1003.100, 1003.102, 1003.103 and 103.105to reflect these provisions. Determination of penalty amount. We propose to establish in 42 CFR 1003.106 three specific criteria andone general criterion that we would consider in determining the penaltyamount_ andbullet; The degree of culpability of the hospital and the responsiblephysicians.andbullet; The seriousness of the individual's condition in seeking emergencymedical services.andbullet; The prior history of the hospital and the responsible physiciansin failing to provide appropriate emergency medical services or appropriatetransfers.andbullet; Other matters required by justice.We specifically welcome comment on the application of these and other possiblecriteria, and on the inclusion of specific aggravating and mitigating factors,to be considered in levying penalties under this provision. We believe that the authority to assess civil money penalties against theresponsible physician as well as the hospital will be a strong incentivefor both the physician and the hospital to respond to the medical needsof individuals with emergency medical conditions and women in active labor.HCFA would refer appropriate cases for possible money penalties to theOIG, while at the same time HCFA will authorize the Medicare State surveyagency to conduct a complaint investigation if warranted. The OIG would have to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that thehospital or the responsible physician or physicians, or both, failed toprovide emergency medical treatment as required by section 1867 of theAct. This provision would be in 42 CFR 1003.114.The OIG would notify hospitals and responsible physicians assessed civilmoney penalties in accordance with 42 CFR 1003.109, which includes hospitaland physician appeal rights. We would revise that section to require thatthe notice would include a description of the episode for which the penaltyis proposed and why the penalty is being assessed.We would also make necessary technical changes to andSection;andSection; 1003.100,1003.106, 1003.109 and 1003.114 and add to andSection; 1003.101 definitionsof ``participating hospital'' and ``responsible physician'', as discussedabove.<T3>v. Civil enforcement.</T3>An individual who suffers personal harm, or a medical facility that suffersa financial loss, as a direct result of the hospital's violation of a requirementin 42 CFR 489.24, may bring a civil action, in an appropriate Federal districtcourt, against the hospital for damages and other equitable relief as appropriate.No civil action may be brought more than two years after the date of theviolation. The Federal district court will apply the law of the State inwhich the hospital is located. According to the Conference Committee Report,the committee included the language concerning other equitable relief asappropriate as a directive to the courts:<ITAG tagnum="21">[T]he [House of Representatives] language allowing courts to grant`other appropriate relief' was also modified to read `other equitable reliefas appropriate', to give the courts clearer direction that such reliefshould be within the courts regular equitable powers and should be grantedfor the purpose of remedying the violation or deterring subsequent violations.(H.R. Rep. No. 453, 99th Cong., 1st Sess. 476 (1985).)</ITAG>We do not believe it necessary or appropriate to revise the regulationsto reflect this provision. <T3>vi. Preemption of State law. </T3>The legislation provides that itdoes not preempt State or local law except where there is a conflict withthe statutory provision. Since Federal law ordinarily supersedes Statelaw where there is a conflict, it is not necessary to include this provisionin regulations.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Responsibilities of Hospitals Receiving Improperly TransferredIndividual. </ITAG>Preliminary findings of study being conducted by the OIG have confirmedthat a number of patients in unstable condition have been transferred improperlyand that the cases have not been reported to HCFA. Because we need to knowabout <T3>all </T3>improper transfers, we are proposing to add a new paragraph(g) to andSection; 489.20 to require a hospital that suspects it may havereceived an improperly transferred individual to report to HCFA and tothe State survey agency. To be in compliance with this requirement, thereceiving hospital would have to report any suspected incident within 72hours of its occurrence. This requirement would appear in manual instructions.We propose to include in andSection;489.24 a paragraph (f) that would requirea hospital to report promptly patients it receives who were transferredin suspected violation of andSection;489.24(d).  We also propose to add a paragraph to andSection;489.53(a) to show that failureto report improper transfers may subject the receiving hospital to terminationof its provider agreement.  In those instances in which HCFA determines that a hospital is in violationof andSection;489.20(g), we would initiate termination action.  <ITAG tagnum="81">3. State Survey Agency Responsibilities  </ITAG>The preliminary findings of the OIG study also identified incidents ofimproper transfer being reported to the State survey agency that were notthen reported to HCFA.  To assure that we are aware of all instances of improper transfer, we alsopropose to require the State survey agencies to report promptly any crediblecomplaints (that is, complaints that are specific and detailed enough tobe investigated) related to violations of section 1867 of the Act. Therefore,we intend to revise andSection;405.1903, Documentation of findings, by addinga new paragraph (d) that would require State survey agencies to informHCFA of credible reports of violations of andSection;489.24.  <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Regulatory Impact Statement  </ITAG>A. Introduction  Executive Order (E.O.) 12291 requires us to prepare and publish an initialregulatory impact analysis for any proposed regulation that meets one ofthe E.O., criteria for a ``major rule''; that is, that would be likelyto result in: an annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more;a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographic regions; or,significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment, productivity,innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprises to competewith foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets. In addition,we generally prepare a regulatory flexibility analysis that is consistentwith the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) (5 U.S.C. 601 through 612), unlessthe Secretary certifies that a proposed regulation would not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. Also, section1102(b) of the Act requires the Secretary to prepare a regulatory impactanalysis if this proposed rule may have a significant impact on the operationsof a substantial number of small rural hospitals. Such an analysis alsomust conform to the provisions of section 603 of the RFA. For purposesof the RFA, we treat all providers as small entities.  B. Impact on CHAMPUS, CHAMPVA, and VA programs  This proposed rule would require hospitals to provide inpatient hospitalservices to individuals who have insurance coverage under CHAMPUS, CHAMPVA,and VA programs. Further, the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA-determined allowable amountfrom these programs must be accepted as payment in full (less applicabledeductible, patient cost-share and noncovered items). The effect of thesetwo requirements is the result of the statute, not this proposed rule.C. Impact on Hospitals The provision requiring a Medicare participating hospital with an organizedemergency department to provide emergency services within the capabilitiesof the hospital to any individual with an emergency medical condition andto any woman in active labor would ensure that everyone in an emergencysituation will be stabilized before discharge or transfer, or the hospitalmay be terminated or suspended from the Medicare program. This provisionis also the result of the statute and not this proposed rule, and we havebeen actively enforcing the statutory requirements. Further, it shouldbe noted that currently, under 42 CFR 124.600, et seq., of the Public HealthService (PHS) regulations, the nearly five thousand hospitals nationwidethat received Hill Burton construction grants and loans are required toparticipate in the Medicare program if eligible to do so. Under these regulations,hospitals are required to provide emergency medical services to any personwho resides (or, in the case of some hospitals, works) in the hospital'sdesignated health service area. We believe the great majority of hospitals do not inappropriately transferor refuse to treat patients with limited ability to pay for services. Theaggregate economic impact of this provision should be minimal, primarilyaffecting only those hospitals not already under a Hill-Burton agreement,those not complying with their agreements, or those hospitals that as amatter of policy have interpreted their obligations narrowly and refusedservices to individuals not specifically covered by the Hill-Burton requirements(i.e., those not living or working in the given hospital's designated healthservice area). We also are proposing to require each hospital to retain a separate, signedacknowledgement from the beneficiary attesting to the receipt of the ``ImportantMessage from Medicare'' and a copy of the ``Message'' itself. Althoughthis would create a slight increase in hospital administrative costs, itis not expected to affect Medicare or Medicaid program expenditures significantly.Hospital cost increases would be limited to obtaining and retaining thebeneficiary's acknowledgement. However, we believe that over the long runmore informed patients should reduce the necessity to file complaints,off-setting any increased costs. D. Impact on Patients After the 1979 establishment of the above-mentioned Hill-Burton requirement,very few community service complaints have been filed with PHS' Officefor Civil Rights, although numerous criticisms have been reported in themedia concerning admissions for emergency services. We believe that establishmentof an additional, broader requirement and an additional avenue of complaintmay result in reporting of a larger number of incidents. However, in viewof the PHS experience we continue to anticipate that incidents will besporadic and relatively isolated. We expect this provision basically toincrease the incentives for hospitals to avoid such incidents thus improvingemergency care for uninsured individuals. E. Conclusion For these reasons, we have determined that a regulatory impact analysisis not required. Further, we have determined, and the Secretary certifies,that this proposed rule would not have a significant economic impact ona substantial number of small entities and would not have a significantimpact on the operations of a substantial number of small rural hospitals.Therefore, we have not prepared a regulatory flexibility analysis. V. Paperwork Reduction Act Sections 405.1903, 489.20 and 489.27 of this proposed rule contain informationcollection requirements. As required by the Paperwork Reduction Act of1980 (44 U.S.C. 3504), we have submitted a copy of this proposed rule tothe Executive Office of Management and Budget (EOMB) for its review ofthese requirements. Other organizations and individuals desiring to submitcomments on the information collection requirements should follow the instructionsin the <T2>ADDRESS </T2>section. VI. Response to Comments Because of the large number of comments we receive on proposed regulations,we cannot acknowledge or respond to them individually. However, in preparingthe final rule, we will consider all comments received timely and respondto the major issues in the preamble to that rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>42 CFR Part 405Administrative practice and procedure, Health facilities, Health professions,Kidney diseases, Laboratories, Medicare, Nursing homes, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Rural areas, X-rays.42 CFR Part 485Health facilities, Medicare, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements.42 CFR Part 489Health facilities, Medicare.42 CFR Part 1001Administrative practice and procedure, Fraud, Health facilities, Healthprofessions, Medicare.42 CFR Part 1003Administrative practice and procedure, Archives and records, Grant programs_socialprograms, Maternal and child health, Medicaid, Medicare, Penalties.Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations would be amended as follows:A. Chapter IV is amended as follows:1. Part 405, Subpart S is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 405_FEDERAL HEALTH INSURANCE FOR THE AGED AND DISABLED</ITAG>a. The authority citation for Part 405, Subpart S is revised to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395f, 1395x, 1395bb, 1395cc, 1395dd,1395qq, 1395rr, and 1395tt.</ITAG>b. Section 405.1903 is amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 405.1903</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Documentation of findings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) If the State agency receives credible information (that is, informationthat is specific and detailed enough to be investigated) to the effectthat a hospital has violated andSection; 489.24 of this part, the State agencyis to report the information to HCFA promptly.2. Part 489 is amended as follows:a. The authority citation for Part 489 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1861, 1864m, 1866, 1867, and 1871 of theSocial Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1395x, 1395aa, 1395cc, 1395dd, and1395hh), and sec. 602(k) of Pub. L. 98-21 (42 U.S.C. 1395ww note).</ITAG>b. The table of contents is amended by adding andSection;andSection; 489.24,489.25, 489.26, and 489.27 to Subpart B to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 489_PROVIDER AGREEMENTS UNDER MEDICARE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Essentials of Provider Agreements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">489.24 Special responsibilities of Medicare hospitals in emergencycases.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">489.25 Special requirements concerning the CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">489.26 Special requirements concerning veterans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">289.27 Beneficiary statement of discharge rights.</ITAG>c. In andSection; 489.20, the introductory text is republished and the sectionis amended by adding paragraphs (f), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and by revisingparagraphs (d) and (e) as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basic commitments.</ITAG>The provider agrees_<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) In the case of a hospital that furnishes inpatient hospital servicesto a beneficiary, to either furnish directly or make arrangements for allitems and services (other than physicians' services as described in andSection;405.550(b) of this chapter) for which the beneficiary is entitled to havepayment made under Medicare;(e) In the case of a hospital that furnishes inpatient hospital servicesfor which payment may be made under Subpart D of Part 405 of this chapter,to maintain an agreement with a utilization and quality control peer revieworganization (if there is such an organization for the area in which thehospital is located, which has a contract with HCFA under Part B of titleXI of the Act) for that organization to review the admissions, quality,appropriateness, and diagnostic information related to such inpatient hospitalservices;(f) In the case of a hospital with an emergency department, to comply withandSection; 489.24 of this subpart; (g) In the case of a hospital, to report to HCFA and the State survey agencyany suspected incident of receiving an individual that has been transferredin unstable condition or in active labor from another hospital, withoutprior arrangement, in violation of the requirements of andSection; 489.24(d)of this subpart; (h) In the case of inpatient hospital services, to participate in any healthplan contracted for under 10 U.S.C. 1079 or 1086 or 38 U.S.C. 613, in accordancewith andSection; 489.25 of this subpart; (i) In the case of inpatient hospital services, to admit veterans whoseadmission has been authorized under 38 U.S.C. 603, in accordance with andSection;489.26 of this subpart; and (j) In the case of a hospital, to comply with andSection; 489.27 of thissubpart by giving each beneficiary a statement of his or her dischargerights, obtaining a separate, signed acknowledgement from the beneficiaryattesting to the receipt of the statement of discharge rights, and maintaininga copy of the acknowledgement. d. A new section 489.24 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special responsibilities of Medicare hospitals in emergency cases.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> In the case of a hospital that has an emergency department,if any individual (whether or not eligible for Medicare benefits) comesto the emergency department and a request is made on the individual's behalffor examination or treatment of a medical condition, the hospital mustprovide for an appropriate medical screening examination within the capabilityof the hospital's emergency department to determine whether or not an emergencymedical condition exists or to determine if the individual is in activelabor. The examinations must be conducted by individuals determined qualifiedby hospital by-laws and who meet the requirements of andSection; 482.55 concerningemergency services personnel and direction. (b) <T3>Definitions.</T3> ``Active labor'' means labor at a time at which deliveryis imminent; there is inadequate time to effect safe transfer to anotherhospital before delivery; or a transfer may pose a threat to the healthand safety of the patient or the unborn child. ``Emergency medical condition'' means a medical condition manifesting itselfby acute symptoms of sufficient severity (including severe pain) that theabsence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected toresult in: (1) Placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy; (2) Serious impairment to bodily functions; or (3) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part. ``Stabilized'' means, with respect to an emergency medical condition, thatno material deterioration of the condition is likely, within reasonablemedical probability, to result from the transfer of the individual froma facility. ``To stabilize'' means, with respect to an emergency medical condition,to provide the medical treatment of the condition necessary to assure,within reasonable medical probability, that no material deterioration ofthe condition is likely to result from the transfer of the individual froma facility. ``Transfer'' means the movement (including the discharge) of a patientoutside a hospital's facilities at the direction of any person employedby (or affiliated or associated, directly or indirectly, with) the hospital,but does not include such a movement of a patient who (1) has been declareddead, or (2) leaves the facility without the permission of any such person.(c) <T3>Necessary stabilizing treatment for emergency medical conditions andactive labor</T3>_(1) <T3>General. </T3>If any individual (whether or not eligible for Medicarebenefits) comes to a hospital and the hospital determines that the individualhas an emergency medical condition or is in active labor, the hospitalmust provide either_ (i) Within the capabilities of the staff and facilities available at thehospital, for further medical examination and treatment as required tostabilize the medical condition or to provide for treatment of the labor;or (ii) For transfer of the individual to another medical facility in accordancewith paragraph (d) of this section. (2) <T3>Refusal to consent to treatment. </T3>A hospital meets the requirementsof paragraph (c)(1)(i) of this section with respect to an individual ifthe hospital offers the individual the further medical examination andtreatment described in that paragraph but the individual (or a legallyresponsible person acting on the individual's behalf) refuses to consentin writing to the examination or treatment. (3) <T3>Refusal to consent to transfer. </T3>A hospital meets the requirementsof paragraph (c)(1)(ii) of this section with respect to an individual ifthe hospital offers to transfer the individual to another medical facilityin accordance with paragraph (d) of this section but the individual (ora legally responsible person acting on the individual's behalf) refusesto consent to the transfer. (d) <T3>Restricting transfers until the patient is stabilized.</T3>_(1) <T3>General. </T3>If a patient at a hospital has an emergency medical conditionthat has not been stabilized (as defined in paragraph (b) of this section)or is in active labor, the hospital may not transfer the patient unless_(i)(A) The patient (or a legally responsible person acting on the patient'sbehalf) requests the transfer; or (B) A physician (within the meaning of section 1861(r)(1) of the Act) orother qualified medical personnel when a physician is not readily availablein the emergency department, has signed a certification that, based uponthe reasonable risks and benefits to the patient, and based upon the informationavailable at the time, the meidcal benefits reasonably expected from theprovision of appropriate medical treatment at another medical facilityoutweigh the increased risks to the individual's medical condition frombeing transferred; and (ii) The transfer is an appropriate transfer. (2) A transfer to another medical facility will be appropriate only inthose cases_ (i) In which the receiving facility_ (A) Has available space and qualified personnel for the treatment of thepatient; and(B) Has agreed to accept transfer of the patient and to provide appropriatemedical treatment;(ii) In which the transferring hospital provides the receiving facilitywith appropriate medical records (or copies of them) of the examinationand treatment furnished at the transferring hospital;(iii) In which the transfer is effected through qualified personnel andtransportation equipment, as required, including the use of necessary andmedically appropriate life support measures during the transfer; and (iv) That meets such other requirements as the Secretary may find necessaryin the interest of the health and safety of patients transferred.(e) <T3>Termination of provider agreement.</T3> If a hospital knowingly andwillfully, or negligently, fails to meet the requirements of paragraphs(a) through (d) of this section, HCFA will terminate the provider agreementin accordance with andSection; 489.53 of this subpart or the OIG will suspendthe provider agreement in accordance with andSection; 1001.202 of this title.(f) <T3>Recipient hospital responsibilities.</T3> If a hospital receives apatient transferred in suspected violation of paragraph (d) of this section,it must report the incident promptly to the State survey agency and toHCFA. In accordance with andSection; 489.53 of this part, HCFA may terminatethe hospital for failure to report the incident.e. A new andSection; 489.25 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special requirements concerning CHAMPUS and CHAMPVA programs.</ITAG>For inpatient services, a hospital that participates in the Medicare programmust participate in any health plan contracted under 10 U.S.C. 1079 or1086 (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services) andunder 38 U.S.C. 613 (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the VeteransAdministration) and accept the CHAMPUS/CHAMPVA-determined allowable amountas payment in full, less applicable deductible, patient cost-share, andnoncovered items. Hospitals must meet the requirements of 32 CFR Part 199concerning program benefits under the Department of Defense. This sectionapplies to inpatient services furnished to beneficiaries admitted on orafter January 1, 1987.f. A new andSection; 489.26 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special requirements concerning veterans.</ITAG>For inpatient services, a hospital that participates in the Medicare programmust admit any veteran whose admission is authorized by the Veterans Administrationunder 38 U.S.C. 603 and must meet the requirements of 38 CFR Part 17 concerningadmissions practices and payment methodology and amounts. This sectionapplies to services furnished to veterans admitted on and after July 1,1987.g. A new andSection; 489.27 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Beneficiary statement of discharge rights.</ITAG>A hospital that participates in the Medicare program must furnish eachMedicare beneficiary, or an individual acting on his or her behalf, thestatement of discharge rights HCFA supplies to the hospital to implementsection 1866(a)(1)(M) of the Act. The hospital must furnish the statementat or about the time of admission, obtain a separate, signed acknowledgementfrom the beneficiary attesting to the receipt of the statement, and maintaina copy of the acknowledgement. This provision is effective with admissionsbeginning on or after [effective date of final rule].h. In andSection; 489.53, the introductory language of paragraph (a) is republished,paragraph (a) is amended by adding subparagraphs (10), (11), and (12),paragraph (b) is revised, and paragraph (c)(2) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 489.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination by HCFA.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Basis for termination of agreement with any provider.</T3> HCFA mayterminate the agreement with any provider if HCFA finds that any of thefollowing failings is attributable to that provider:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(10) In the case of a hospital that suspects that it may have receivedan individual transferred by another hospital in violation of andSection;489.24(d)of this subpart, the hospital failed to report the incident to HCFA andthe State survey agency. (11) In the case of a hospital requested to furnish inpatient servicesto CHAMPUS or CHAMPVA beneficiaries or to veterans, it failed to complywith andSection;489.25 of andSection;489.26 of this part, respectively. (12) It failed to furnish the notice of discharge rights as required byandSection;489.27 of this part.  (b) <T3>Required termination of provider agreement. </T3>(1) In the case of a hospital that has an emergency department, HCFA willterminate the provider agreement if the hospital fails to comply with therequirements of andSection;489.24(a) through (d) of this subpart, which requiresthe hospital to examine, treat or transfer emergency medical conditionor active labor cases appropriately. (Under some circumstances, the OIGmay suspend the agreement instead of HCFA terminating it; see andSection;1001.202of this title.) (2) HCFA will terminate a SNF's provider agreement if it determines that_(i) The SNF no longer meets a condition of participation specified in Part405, Subpart K of this chapter; and (ii) The SNF's deficiencies pose immediate jeopardy to patients' healthand safety. (c) <T3>Notice of termination. * * * </T3>(2) <T3>Exception. </T3>(i) For a SNF with deficiencies that pose immediatejeopardy to patients' health and safety, HCFA will give notice of terminationat least 2 days before the effective date of termination of the provideragreement. (ii) If HCFA finds that a hospital is in violation of andSection;489.24 (a)through (d) of this part, HCFA will determine that the violation posesimmediate and serious jeopardy to the health and safety of the patientspresenting themselves to the hospital for emergency services and HCFA willterminate within two days after the determination is made. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(B) Chapter V, Part 1001 is amended as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1001_PROGRAM INTEGRITY: MEDICARE  </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 1001 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 1102, 1128, 1842(j) 1842(k), 1862(d), 1862(e),1866(b)(2)(D), (E) and (F), 1867, and 1871 of the Social Security Act (42U.S.C. 1302, 1320a-7, 1395u(j), 1395u(k) and 1395y(d), 1395y(e), 1395cc(b)(D),(E) and (F), 1395dd and 1395hh), unless otherwise noted. </ITAG>2. The Table of Contents for Subpart C is amended by revising the titlesof the subpart and andSection;andSection;1001.211 and 1001.221, and by addingentries for andSection;andSection;1001.202 and 1001.203.  <ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Termination on Suspension of Provider Agreement and ReinstatementAfter Termination or Suspension  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1001.202 Suspension of a provider agreement by the OIG. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1001.203 Notice and appeal procedures for termination or suspensionof provider agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1001.211 Exceptions to effective date of termination or suspensionof provider agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1001.221 Reinstatement after termination or suspension of provideragreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Termination or Suspension of Provider Agreement and ReinstatementAfter Termination or Suspension</ITAG>2a. The title of Subpart C is revised to read as set forth above.3. In Subpart A, andSection; 1001.2 is amended by adding the definition forthe term ``participating hospital'' to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1001.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>``Participating hospital'' means a hospital that has entered into a Medicareprovider agreement under section 1866 of the Act and has, under the agreement,obligated itself to comply with the requirements of section 1867 of theAct.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>4. In Subpart C, andSection; 1001.201 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1001.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination by the OIG.</ITAG><T3>Basis for termination.</T3> The OIG may terminate the agreement ofany provider if the OIG finds that any of the following failings can beattributed to that provider:(a) It has knowingly and willfully made, or caused to be made, any falsestatement or representation of a material fact for use in an applicationor request for payment under Medicare.(b) It has submitted, or caused to be submitted, requests for Medicarepayment of amounts that substantially exceed the costs it incurred in furnishingthe services for which payment is requested.(c) It has furnished services that the OIG has determined to be substantiallyin excess of the needs of individuals or of a quality that fails to meetprofessionally recognized standards of health care. The OIG will not terminatea provider agreement under this section if HCFA has waived a disallowancewith respect to the services in question on the grounds that the providerand the beneficiary could not reasonably be expected to know the paymentwould not be made. (The rules for determining such lack of knowledge areset forth in andSection;andSection; 405.334 and 405.336 of this title.)5. New andSection;andSection; 1001.202 and 1001.203 are added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1001.202</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension of a provider agreement by the OIG.</ITAG>(a) The OIG may suspend the provider agreement of a Medicare participatinghospital with an emergency department when it determines that the hospitalknowingly and willfully, or negligently_(1) Fails to provide an appropriate medical screening examination in accordancewith andSection; 489.24(a) of this title;(2) Fails to provide necessary stabilizing treatment for any individual(whether or not eligible for Medicare) with an emergency medical conditionor in active labor in accordance with andSection; 489.24(b) and (c) of thistitle, or,(3) Transfers the individual before he or she is stabilized in accordancewith andSection; 489.24(b) and (d) of this title.(b) In addition to suspending the provider agreement of a hospital, theOIG may impose a civil monetary penalty against the hospital and the responsiblephysician(s) if the OIG determines that the hospital or physician(s) knowinglyviolated the requirement set forth in andSection; 489.24 of this title. Ifthe OIG makes such a determination, it will use the penalty determination,notification, effectuation, and appeal procedures contained in andSection;andSection;1003.100 through 1003.130 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1001.203</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice and appeal procedures for termination or suspension of provideragreements.</ITAG>If the OIG makes a determination under andSection; 1001.201 or andSection;1001.202 (a) or (b) of this part and proposes to terminate or suspend theprovider agreement of the Medicare participating hospital, the OIG willuse the determination, notification, effectuation, and appeal procedurescontained in andSection;andSection; 1001.105 through 1001.114 of this part.6. In andSection; 1001.211, the title is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1001.211</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exceptions to effective date of termination or suspension of provideragreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>7. Section 1001.221 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1001.221</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reinstatement after termination or suspension of provider agreement.</ITAG>When a provider agreement has been terminated by the OIG under andSection;1001.201, or by HCFA under andSection; 489.53 of this title, or suspendedby the OIG under andSection; 1001.202, the OIG or HCFA, as appropriate, willnot accept a new agreement, in the case of termination, or reinstate anexisting agreement, in the case of a suspension, unless the OIG or HCFA(as appropriate) finds_(a) That the reason for termination or suspension of the previous agreementhas been removed and there is reasonable assurance that it will not recur;and (b) That the provider has fulfilled, or has made satisfactory arrangementsto fulfill, all of the statutory and regulatory responsibilities of itsprevious agreement.C. Chapter V, Part 1003 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 1003_CIVIL MONEY PENALTIES AND ASSESSMENTS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 1003 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 1102, 1128, 1128A, 1842(j), 1842(k) and 1867(d)(2)of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1302, 1320a-7, 1320a-7a, 1395u(j),1395u(k) and 1395dd(d)(2)).</ITAG>2. Section 1003.100 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1003.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis and purpose.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Basis.</T3> This part implements sections 1128(c), 1128A, 1842(j),1842(k), 1867(d)(2), and 1867(f) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.1320a-7(c), 1320a-7a, 1395u(j), 1395u(k), and 1395dd(d)(2)).(b) <T3>Purpose.</T3> This part (1) establishes procedures for imposing (i)civil money penalties and assessments against persons who have submittedcertain prohibited claims under the Medicare, Medicaid, or the Maternaland Child Health Services Block Grant programs, and (ii) civil money penaltiesagainst a participating hospital with an emergency department and responsiblephysician or physicians who fail to provide emergency medical treatmentas specified in andSection; 489.24 of this chapter to any individual whohas an emergency medical condition or is in active labor;(2) Establishes procedures for suspending from the Medicare and Medicaidprograms, persons against whom a civil money penalty or assessment hasbeen imposed; and (3) specifies the appeal rights of persons subject toa penalty or assessment.D. Section 1003.101 is amended by adding definitions for the terms ``participatinghospital'' and ``responsible physician'' to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1003.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this part:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Participating hospital</T3> means a hospital that has entered intoa Medicare provider agreement under section 1866 of the Act and has, underthe agreement, obligated itself to comply with the requirements of section1867 of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Responsible physician </T3>means a physician within the meaning ofsection 1861(r)(1) of the Act who (i) is employed by, or is under contractwith, the participating hospital in providing medical services, and (ii)acting in such capacity, has professional responsibility for the provisionof examinations or treatments for an individual, or transfer of the individual,who is seeking emergency medical treatment or who is in active labor. Aphysician may be employed by, or under contract with, a hospital even throughthe physician receives no compensation from the hospital for furnishingmedical services if the physician has a written or oral agreement withthe hospital to take the professional responsibility cited above. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>4. Section 1003.102 is amended by redesignating existing paragraph (c)as paragraph (d), and by adding a new paragraph (c) and revising paragraph(d) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1003.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basis for civil money penalties and assessments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The OIG may impose a penalty against a participating hospital withan emergency department, any responsible physician, or both, that it determinesin accordance with this part has knowingly violated section 1867(a)-(c)of the Act (42 U.S.C. 1395dd(a), (b) and (c)). (See andSection; 489.24 ofthis chapter.) (d)(1) In any case in which it is determined that more than one personwas responsible for presenting or causing to be presented a claim as describedin paragraph (a) of this section, each such person may be held liable forthe penalty prescribed by this part, and an assessment may be imposed againstany one such person or jointly and severally against two or more such persons,but the aggregate amount of the assessments collected may not exceed theamount that could be assessed if only one person was responsible. (2) In any case in which it is determined that more than one person wasresponsible for presenting or causing to be presented a request for paymentdescribed in paragraph (b) of this section, each such person may be heldliable for the penalty prescribed by this part. (3) In any case in which it is determined that more than one physicianwas responsible for knowingly failing to provide care to an individualwho is seeking emergency medical treatment or who is in active labor inaccordance with section 1867 of the Act, a penalty may be imposed againsteach responsible physician deemed responsible for failing to provide therequired care. 5. Section 1003.103 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1003.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amount of penalty.</ITAG>(a) The OIG may impose a penalty of not more than $2,000 for each itemof service that is subject to a determination under andSection; 1003.102(a)and (b) of this subpart. (b) The OIG may impose a penalty of not more than $50,000 against a participatinghospital and a penalty of not more than $50,000 against each responsiblephysician or physicians for each violation subject to a determination underandSection; 1003.102(c) and (d)(3) of this subpart. 6. Section 1003.105 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1003.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension from participation in Medicare or Medicaid.</ITAG>(a) A person subject to a penalty or assessment determined under andSection;1003.102 (a) and (b) may, in addition, be suspended from participationin Medicare for a period of time determined under andSection; 1003.107. TheOIG may require the appropriate State agency to suspend the person fromthe Medicare program for a period he or she shall specify. The State agencymay request the Secretary to waive suspension of a person from the Medicaidprogram under this section if it concludes that, because of the shortageof providers or other health care personnel in the area, individuals eligibleto receive Medicaid benefits would be denied access to medical care orthat such individuals would suffer hardship. The OIG will notify the Stateagency if and when it waives suspension in response to such a request.(b) Any responsible physician or physicians subject to a penalty determinedunder andSection; 1003.102(c) may, in addition, be excluded from participationin Medicare for a period of up to five years, in accordance with proceduresset forth in andSection;andSection; 1001.100 through 1001.115 and 1001.130through 1001.134 of this chapter. (c) Any suspension under this section shall become effective only afterthere is a final decision of the Secretary pursuant to andSection; 1003.125(f),or at any earlier date that the respondent fails within the time permitted,to exercise his or her right to a hearing under andSection; 1003.109 or administrativereview under andSection; 1003.125. The effect of such suspension shall begoverned by 42 CFR 1001.126 (d) When the Inspector General proposes to suspend a long-term care facilityfrom the Medicare and Medicaid programs, he or she shall, at the same timehe or she notifies the respondent, notify the appropriate State Officeof Aging, the long-term care ombudsman, and the State Medicaid agency ofthe Inspector General's intention to suspend the facility. 7. Section 1003.106 is amended by designating the introductory languageof (b) as (b)(1) and redesignating current subparagraphs (b)(1)-(5) as(b)(1)(i)-(b)(1)(v) and by revising paragraphs (a), redesignated (b) and(c) to read as follows:    <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1003.106 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determinations regarding the amount of the penalty and assessment. </ITAG>(a)(1) In determining the amount of any penalty or in accordance with andSection;1003.102(a) and (b), the OIG will take into account:  (i) The nature of the claim or request for payment and the circumstancesunder which it was presented,  (ii) The degree of culpability of the person submitting the claim or requestfor payment,  (iii) The history of prior offenses of the person submitting the claimrequest for payment,  (iv) The financial condition of the person presenting the claim or requestfor payment, and  (v) Such other matters as justice may require.  (2) In determining the amount of any penalty in accordance with andSection;1003.102(c)the OIG will take into account:  (i) The degree of culpability of the participating hospital and the responsiblephysician or physicians;  (ii) The seriousness of the condition of the individual seeking emergencymedical treatment;  (iii) The prior history of offenses of the hosptial and responsible physicianor physicians in their failure to provide appropriate emergency medicalscreening, stabilization and treatment of the patient, or to effect anappropriate transfer of the patient to another facility; and  (iv) Such other matters as justice may require.  (b) <T3>Guidelines for determining the amount of the penalty or assessment.</T3>_(1)As guidelines for taking into account the factors listed in paragraph (a)(1),of this section, the following circumstances are to be considered. (i) <T3>Nature and circumstances of the claim.</T3> It should be considereda mitigating circumstance if all the items or services subject to a determinationunder andSection;1003.102 included in the action brought under this partwere of the same type and occurred within a short period of time, therewere few such items or services, and the total amount claimed for suchitems or services was less than $1,000. It should be considered as aggravatingcircumstance if such items or services were of several types, occurredover a lengthy period of time, there were many suich items or services(or the nature and circumstances indicate a pattern of claims for suchitems or services), or the amount claimed for such items or services wassubstantial. (ii) <T3>Degree of culpability.</T3> It should be considered a mitigating circumstanceif the claim for the item or service was the result of an unintentionaland unrecognized error in the process respondent followed in presentingclaims, and corrective steps were taken promplty after the error was discovered.It should be considered an aggravating circumstance if the respondent knewthe item or service was not provided as claimed, or if the respondent knewthat no payment could be made because he had been excluded from programreimbursement as specified in andSection;1003.102(a)(2) or because paymentwould violate the terms of an assignment agreement or an agreement witha State agency under andSection;1003.102(b).  (iii) <T3>Prior offenses.</T3> It should be considered an aggravating circumstanceif at any time prior to the presentation of any claim which included anitem or service subject to a determination underandSection;1003.102 (a) and(b), the respondent was held liable for criminal, civil, or administrativesanctions in connection with a program covered by this part or any otherpublic or private program of reimbursement for medical services.  (iv) <T3>Financial condition.</T3> It should be considered a mitigating circumstanceif imposition of the penalty or assessment without reduction will jeopardizethe ability of the respondent to continue as a health care provider. Inall cases, the resources available to the respondent will be consideredwhen determining the amount of the penalty and assessment.  (v) <T3>Other matters as justice may require.</T3> Other circumstances of anaggravating or mitigating nature should be taken into account if, in theinterests of justice, they require either a reduction of the penalty orassessment or an increase in order to assure the achievement of the purposesof this part.(c) As guidelines for determining the amount of the penalty and assessmentto be imposed, for every item, service or incident subject to a determinationunder andSection;1003.102 (a) and (b);(1) If there are substantial or several mitigating circumstances, the aggregateamount of the penalty and assessment should be set at an amount sufficientlybelow the maximum permitted by andSection;andSection;1003.103(a) and 1003.104,to reflect that fact.(2) If there are substantial or several aggravating circumstances, theaggregate amount of the penalty and assessment should be set at an amountsufficiently close to or at the maximum permitted by andSection;andSection;1003.103(a)and 1003.104, to reflect that fact.(3) Unless there are extraordinary mitigating circumstances, the aggregateamount of the penalty and assessment should never be less than double theapproximate amount of damages sustained by the United States, or any State,as a result of claims subject to a determination under andSection;1003.102(a) and (b).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>8. Section 1003.109 is amended by revising paragraph (a) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1003.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of proposed determination.</ITAG>(a) If the Inspector General proposes to impose a penalty and assessment,or to suspend a respondent from participation in Medicare or Medicaid,in accordance with this part, he or she must deliver or send by certifiedmail, return receipt requested, to the respondent, written notice of hisor her intent to impose a penalty, assessment and suspension, as applicable.The notice will include;(1) Reference to the statutory basis for the penalty, assessment, and suspension;(2) With respect to determinations under andSection;1003.102 (a) and (b),a description of the claims and requests for payment with respect to whichthe penalty, assessment, and suspension are proposed (except in cases wherethe Inspector General is relying upon statistical sampling pursuant toandSection;1003.133, in which case the notice shall describe those claimsand requests for payment comprising the sample upon which the InspectorGeneral is relying and shall also briefly describe the statistical samplingtechnique utilized by the Inspector General);(3) With respect to determinations under andSection;1003.102(c), a descriptionof the episode with respect to which the penalty is proposed;(4) The reason why such claims and requests for payment, or failure toprovide emergency medical services as required under section 1867 of theAct, subject the respondent to a penalty, assessment, and suspension; theamount of the proposed penalty, assessment, and the period of proposedsuspension (where applicable);(5) Any circumstances described in andSection;1003.106 which were consideredwhen determining the amount of the proposed penalty of suspension;(6) Instructions for responding to the notice, including a specific statementof respondent's right to a hearing, of the fact that failure to requesta hearing within 30 days permits the imposition of the proposed penalty,assessment, and suspension without right to appeal, and of respondent'sright to request an extension of time in which to respond to the noticeand a copy of the rules contained in this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>9. Section 1003.114 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1003.114 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issues and burden of proof. </ITAG>(a) To the extent that a proposed penalty and assessment is based on claimsor requests for payment presented on or after August 13, 1981, the InspectorGeneral must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondentpresented or caused to be presented such claims or requests for paymentas described in andSection; 1003.102(a) and (b). (b) To the extent that is proposed penalty and assessment is based on claimspresented before August 13, 1981, the Inspector General must prove by clearand convincing evidence that: (1) The respondent presented or caused to be presented such claims as describedin andSection; 1003.102(a) and (b); (2) Presenting or causing to be presented such claims could have renderedrespondent liable under the provisions of the False Claims Act, 31 U.S.C.3729 <T3>et seq</T3>., for payment of an amount not less than that proposed.(c) To the extent that a proposed penalty is based on a violation of section1867 of the Act, the Inspector General must prove by a preponderance ofthe evidence that the hospital and responsible physician or physiciansfailed to provide emergency medical care as described in andSection; 1003.102(c).(d) Where a final determination that the respondent (1) presented or causedto be presented a claim or request for payment falling within the scopeof andSection; 1003.102(a) or (b), or (2) failed to provide emergency medicalservices within the scope of andSection; 1003.102(c), has been rendered inany proceeding in which the respondent was a party and had an opportunityto be heard, the respondent shall be bound by such determination in anyproceeding under this part. (e) The respondent shall bear the burden of producing and proving by apreponderance of the evidence any circumstances described in andSection;1003.106 that would justify reducing the amount of the penalty or assessment,or the period of suspension.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program No. 13.773, Medicare-HospitalInsurance)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: October 20, 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William L. Roper, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Health Care Financing Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: October 20, 1987. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Richard P. Kusserow, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Inspector General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: March 1, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Otis R. Bowen, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc 88-13513 Filed 6-15-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4120-01-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>